Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 17

Contested Elections

2-17-101. Jurisdiction — Standing.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, election contests shall be tried in the chancery court of the division in which the defendant resides. The chief justice of the supreme court shall assign a chancellor from a different division to decide a contested election of chancellor.

The incumbent office holder and any candidate for the office may contest the outcome of an election for the office. Any campaign committee or individual which has charge of a campaign for the adoption or rejection of a question submitted to the people may contest the election on the question.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1701.

Cross-References. Contested election of governor, title 2, ch. 18.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 8, 567.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn Juris., Appeal and Error, § 30; 4 Tenn. Juris., Courts, § 19; 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, §§ 16-23; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 35; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, §§ 5, 18; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Officers, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Procedure and Evidence — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (Edmund M. Morgan, Joel F. Handler), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 921.

2-17-102. Contests for offices of general assembly members.

Contests for the office of senator in the general assembly are decided by the senate, and contests for the office of representative in the general assembly are decided by the house of representatives.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1702.

Attorney General Opinions. The qualifications of a person to hold the office of state senator may be challenged at two different times: first, at the time of placement of qualified candidates' names on the ballot by a county election commission prior to the election; and second, after the election but prior to the taking of the oath in an election contest in the state senate, OAG 02-032 (3/15/02).

2-17-103. Contests for office of presidential and vice presidential elector.

Contests for the office of presidential and vice presidential elector shall be decided finally and unreviewably before the last day of November by the presidential electors tribunal composed of the governor, secretary of state and attorney general and reporter.

A petition of contest shall be filed with the secretary of state and a copy of the petition delivered to the chair of the state executive committee of the political party against whose electors the complaint is made within ten (10) days after the election. The petition shall state each ground of complaint specifically and concisely.

A hearing shall be held on the petition between the fifth and tenth day after it is filed at a time and place set by the governor. The governor shall publish a notice of the hearing in each grand division in a newspaper of general circulation. No other pleadings are required. The complaining political party or candidate for elector and each other candidate may be present at the hearing in person and by counsel, may examine and cross-examine witnesses, and may introduce evidence relevant to the grounds of protest.

The governor may administer oaths and subpoena witnesses for the tribunal. The hearing is not subject to the rules of evidence as applied in courts.

After deciding the contest by majority vote, the tribunal shall record its decision and file it with the returns of the election. The governor, secretary of state, and the attorney general and reporter shall then proceed under § 2-8-110 as in uncontested elections.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 15; T.C.A., § 2-1703.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Newspaper of general circulation defined, §2-1-104.

2-17-104. Contest of primary election.

Any candidate may contest the primary election of the candidate's party for the office for which that person was a candidate.

To institute a contest, the candidate shall, within five (5) days after the certification of results by the county election commission, file a written notice of contest with the state primary board of the candidate's party and with all other candidates who might be adversely affected by the contest. In the notice the candidate shall state fully the grounds of the contest.

The state primary board shall hear and determine the contest and make the disposition of the contest which justice and fairness require, including setting aside the election if necessary.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1704.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, §§ 17, 18, 25; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 23.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §§2-13-102,2-13-103, and2-17-104, which require the establishment of a state primary board for each political party in Tennessee and give that board certain authorities, do not infringe on the political parties’ First Amendment right to freedom of association. OAG 19-11, 2019 Tenn. AG LEXIS 13 (7/30/2019).

2-17-105. Time for filing complaint.

The complaint contesting an election under §2-17-101 shall be filed within five (5) days after certification of the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1705; Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Voter Confidence Act.”

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 568.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 19; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 6; 15 Tenn. Juris. Time, § 1.

2-17-106. Time of trial — Service of process.

The trial of an election contest shall be held not less than fifteen (15) nor more than fifty (50) days from the day the complaint is filed and not less than ten (10) days after the complaint is served on the defendant.

A sheriff or constable of the division or circuit shall serve a copy of the complaint on the defendant and make return to the court.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1706.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 568.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, §§ 19, 20.

2-17-107. Testimony and orders.

The testimony in an election contest may be taken orally or by deposition, upon such notice as the court may prescribe, and the court may make all necessary orders with respect to any matter required in the contest.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1707.

2-17-108. Witnesses.

The clerk of the court may, upon the application of either party, issue subpoenas for witnesses, and the witnesses summoned shall be bound under the same penalties as witnesses in the circuit court to attend and give evidence, and for such attendance shall be allowed the same compensation.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1708.

2-17-109. Poll books, voter signature lists and ballot applications as evidence.

Poll books, voter signature lists and ballot applications, or copies of them, certified by the officer having custody of them, are official records and shall be received as evidence in any case arising out of the election. They may be impeached by other evidence.

If the poll books, voter signature lists and ballot applications or copies of them are not certified, they may nonetheless be proved by other credible evidence and received as evidence in an election contest.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1709; Acts 1990, ch. 727, § 5.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 568.

2-17-110. Voting machine as evidence.

If voting machines were used in the election, any party to the contest who challenges either the accuracy of the voting machines or the accuracy of the election officials' recording of the vote on the machines may have the machine or machines brought into court to be examined by the parties or as evidence.

The total votes shown on the machine shall be conclusive unless the court finds reason to believe that the vote shown on the machine is not accurate.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1710.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 568.

2-17-111. Minutes of proceedings.

The clerk of the court shall keep minutes of the proceedings in contested election cases as in other cases.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1711.

2-17-112. Judgment.

After hearing the case, the court shall give judgment either:

Confirming the election;

Declaring the election void;

Declaring a tie between persons who have the same number of votes if it appears that two (2) or more persons who have the same number of votes have, or would have had if the ballots intended for them and illegally rejected had been received, the highest number of votes for the office; or

Declaring a person duly elected if it appears that such person received or would have received the highest number of votes had the ballots intended for such person and illegally rejected been received.

A judgment under subdivision (a)(4) deprives the person whose election is contested of all right or claim to the office and invests the person declared by the judgment duly elected with the right to the office.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1712.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 569.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 23.

2-17-113. Election declared void.

If the person whose election is contested is found to have received the highest number of legal votes, but the election is declared null by reason of constitutional disqualifications on that person's part or for other causes, the election shall be declared void.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1713.

2-17-114. Certification of judgment.

A judgment confirming an election or declaring a person elected to an office commissioned by the governor shall be certified to the secretary of state. In all other cases, the judgment shall be certified to the tribunal before which the officer is required to qualify.

A judgment declaring a tie shall be certified to the officer or body entitled to cast the deciding vote, if any, and, if none, to the officer or body authorized to fill the vacancy or order a new election.

A judgment declaring an election void shall be certified to the officer or body authorized to fill the vacancy or order a new election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1714.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 569.

2-17-115. Malicious or frivolous contests.

Costs and a reasonable attorney's fee shall be assessed against the contestant or the appellant if the contest or the appeal is maliciously or frivolously prosecuted.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1715.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 569.

2-17-116. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-17-116 (Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1716; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2), concerning appeal, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 737, § 1, effective May 17, 2000.

2-17-117. Circumstances justifying recount — Determining procedure for recount.

Any court, primary board, legislative body, or tribunal having jurisdiction of an election contest pursuant to this chapter may order a recount of the ballots under any of the following circumstances:

A tie vote;

An indication of fraud if the number of votes affected would be sufficient to change the result of the election;

A malfunction of a voting machine or tabulator if the number of votes affected would be sufficient to change the result of the election; or

In any other instance the court or body with jurisdiction of a contested election finds that a recount is warranted.

Any recount ordered by this section shall be a complete recount of all ballots cast in such election.

The court or body with jurisdiction of a contested election shall determine if the recount shall be conducted by hand or with automated tabulators.

Acts 2001, ch. 465, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 465, § 1, provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as “The 2000 Presidential Election Debacle Reform Bill of 2001.”